src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON k42e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^IUML%>i MscObl_Flag ; ! degi
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^IUML%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! degnum
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt42
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k43 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  faðir
  k43e    ;
  k_flt43 ;
!
LEXICON k43e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGACC      ;
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
  +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:faðirinum MscObl_Flag ;
  +N+Msc:faðir S_M_SGGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k_flt43
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLNOM ;
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLACC ;
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLDAT ;
  +N+Msc:fedr   S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k44 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  bróðir, stem is ZERO
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:bróðir     MscNom_Flag    ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:bróðirin   MscNom_Flag    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:bróður     MscObl_Flag     ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:bróðurin   MscObl_Flag     ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:bróður     MscObl_Flag     ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:bróðurinum MscObl_Flag     ;
   +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:bróðrinum  MscObl_Flag     ;
              +N+Msc:bróður     S_M_SGGEN_NULL ;
    k_flt44        ;
!
LEXICON k_flt44
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:brøður  S_M_PLNOM_NULL_NULL ; ! brøður
 +N+Msc:brøður  S_M_PLACC_NULL_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:brøðr S_M_PLDAT           ;
 +N+Msc:brøðr S_M_PLGEN           ;
!
LEXICON k45 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  spónur
  k45e    ;
  k_flt45 ;
!
LEXICON k45e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt45
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k46 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  fjørðu
 k46e ;
 k_flt46 ;
!
LEXICON k46e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA  S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt46
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^OEA  S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k47 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  sonur
  k47e    ;
  k_flt47 ;
!
LEXICON k47e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt47
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k48 
 !! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  hamar
  k48e    ;
  k_flt48 ;
!
LEXICON k48e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k_flt48
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH       S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k49 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  verkur
  k49e    ;
  k_flt49 ;
!
LEXICON k49e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt49
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^JDEL S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k50 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  skjøldur (non_poetic)
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGNOM  ; ! skjøldur   
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGACC  ; ! skjøld
 +N+Msc:%>ur       S_M_SGACC  ; ! skjøldur
 +N+Msc:%>r        S_M_SGDAT  ; ! skjøldri
 +N+Msc:%>r^IUML   S_M_SGDAT  ; ! skildri
 +N+Msc:^IUML      S_M_SGDAT  ; ! skildi
 +N+Msc:%>r^OEA    S_M_SGGEN_AR ; ! skjaldrar
 +N+Msc:^OEA       S_M_SGGEN_AR ; ! skjaldar
 +N+Msc:%>r        S_M_PLNOM   ;
 +N+Msc:           S_M_PLNOM_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML      S_M_PLNOM_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:%>r        S_M_PLACC   ;
 +N+Msc:           S_M_PLACC_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML      S_M_PLACC_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:%>r        S_M_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Msc:           S_M_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Msc:%>r^OEA S_M_PLGEN    ;
 +N+Msc:%>r^OEA S_M_PLGEN_AR    ;
!
LEXICON k51 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  luður
 +N+Msc:ð  S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_SGGEN ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:nn S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k52/kv2_1
 k52   ;
 kv2_1 ; !
LEXICON k52 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  primus
  k52e    ;
  k_flt52 ;
!
LEXICON k52e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k_flt52
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k53 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  aðal
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN      ;






!! ### Lexica for feminines

LEXICON kv1/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv1 ;
  kv2 ;
!
!LEXICON kv_flt0
!  +N+Pl+Nom: # ;
!  +N+Pl+Acc: # ;
!  +N+Pl+Dat: # ;
!  +N+Pl+Gen: # ;
!  
!LEXICON kv_flt ! gætur, paradigm missing in dictionary
!  +N+Pl+Nom:%>ur # ;
!
LEXICON kv1 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  genta
  kv1e    ;
  kv_flt1 ;
!
LEXICON kv1e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: W_F_SGNOM ;
 +N+Fem: W_F_SGOBL ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv2/6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2 ;
  kv6 ;
!
LEXICON kv2/27
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2  ;
  kv27 ;
!
LEXICON kv2/3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2 ;
  kv3 ;
!
LEXICON kv2e/h3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2e ;
  h3e ;
!
LEXICON kv2e/17e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2e  ;
  kv17e ;
!
LEXICON kv1/2_1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  		kv1   ;
  :%>o 	kv2_1 ;
!
LEXICON kv2_1/h5e !
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  sodavatn -> sodavatnir
  kv2_1 ;
  h5e   ;
!
LEXICON kv2_1 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** aktión
  kv2_1e  ;
  kv_flt2 ;  
!
LEXICON kv2_1e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
  +N+Fem: S_N_SGG_s ;
!
LEXICON kv2 ! bygd
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2e    ;
  kv_flt2 ;
!
LEXICON kv_bd2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv2e ;
!
LEXICON kv2e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv3/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv3 ;
  kv2 ;
!
LEXICON kv3/5
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv3 ;
  kv5 ;
!
LEXICON kv3/7
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv3 ;
  kv7 ;
!
LEXICON kv3 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** søgn
  kv3e    ;
  kv_flt3 ;
!
LEXICON kv3e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:      F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv4 ! fonn
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv4e    ;
  kv_flt4 ;
!
LEXICON kv4e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:     S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt4
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^OA F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:     F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OA F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv5 ! øld
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv5e    ;
  kv_flt5 ;
!
LEXICON kv5e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt5
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:      F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:      F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;
 !
LEXICON kv6/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv6 ;
  kv2 ;
