src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
men+CmpNP/None:men kv2/6 ;
LEXICON Nouns
kommissarius:kommissarius k52 ;
skjøldur:skjøld k50 ;
friðarskjøldur:friðarskjøld k50 ;
luður+CmpNP/None:lu k51 ;
temuður:temu k51 ;
bruður:bru k51 ;
ferðaútreiðslur:ferðaútreiðsl kv_flt1 ;
svimjibuksur:svimjibuks kv_flt1 ;
roðbuksur:roðbuks kv_flt1 ;
yrkingargávur:yrkingargáv kv_flt1 ;
snjóklokka:snjóklokk kv1 ;
undankoma:undankom kv1 ;
nátturðapípa:nátturðapíp kv1 ;
fyrndargøta:fyrndar#gøt kv1 ;
breiðingarkvísl:breiðingarkvísl kv6/2 ;
verkgrein:verk#grein kv6/2 ;
vinnugrein:vinnu#grein kv6/2 ;
hundadagar:hunda#dag k_flt42 ;
óvitadagar:ó#vita#dag k_flt42 ;
ellidagar:elli#dag k_flt42 ;
ellisdagar:ellis#dag k_flt42 ;
radius:radius k52 ;
fíggjarvánir:fíggjarván kv_flt2 ;
páskir+Err/Orth:páskar kv_flt2 ;
suppuurtir:suppuurt kv_flt2 ;
hvølpalótir:hvølpalót kv_flt2 ;
nominatión:nominatión kv2_1 ;
elevatión:elevatión kv2_1 ;
savnsmynd:savnsmynd kv2 ;
tannklinikk:tannklinikk kv2_1 ;
blóðsoran:blóðsoran kv2 ;
oyggjaleið:oyggjaleið kv2 ;
ordan:ordan k52/kv2_1 ;
fransiskanaraordan:fransiskanaraordan k52/kv2_1 ;
hálvøld:hálv#øld kv5 ;
kirkjugarðshvonn:kirkjugarðshvonn kv4 ;
kaffikvørn:kaffikvørn kv2/3 ;
kjøtkvørn:kjøtkvørn kv2/3 ;
undirkonto:undir#kont kv1/2_1 ;
bundnakonto:bundna#kont kv1/2_1 ;
tulkakonto:tulkakont kv1/2_1 ;
reguleringskonto:regulerings#kont kv1/2_1 ;
hurðarrás:hurðarrás kv2/27 ;
hugmóð:hugmóð kv2e/h3e ;
gosrøð:gosrøð kv3/5 ;
piparkvørn:piparkvørn kv2/3 ;
stjúkfaðir:stjúk k43 ;
ættarfaðir:ættar k43 ;
forfaðir:for k43 ;
móðurfaðir:móður k43 ;
fornfedrar:forn k_flt43 ;
aftan:aftan k53 ;
trettandaaftan:trettanda#aftan k53 ;
budingsaftan:budings#aftan k53 ;
ólavsøkuaftan:ólav#søku#aftan k53 ;
orsøk:orsøk kv2/3 ;
fimleikahøll:fimleikahøll kv3 ;
umsøgn:um#søgn kv3 ;
uttanbíggjarjørð:uttanbíggjarjørð kv3 ;
bróðir: k44 ;
tvíburabróðir:tvíbura# k44 ;
fosturbróðir:fostur# k44 ;
longubróðir:longu# k44 ;
skarafonn:skarafonn kv4 ;
bakkahvonn:bakkahvonn kv4 ;
bókarøð:bókarøð kv3/5 ;
nummarrøð:nummarrøð kv3/5 ;
sagispónur:sagispón k45 ;
telgispónur:telgispón k45 ;
saguspónur:saguspón k45 ;
sápuspónur:sápuspón k45 ;
røðir:røð kv_flt5 ;
útvarpsrødd:útvarpsrødd kv5 ;
fiskaørn:fiskaørn kv5 ;
deyðavatnsfjørður:deyðavatnsfjørð k46 ;
mittfjørður:mittfjørð k46 ;
drýlafjøl:drýlafjøl kv3/7 ;
vaskifjøl:vaskifjøl kv3/7 ;
dygdarfjøl:dygdarfjøl kv3/7 ;
lomvigarás:lomviga#rás kv2/27 ;
spreingirás:spreingi#rás kv2/27 ;
sniðrás:snið#rás kv2/27 ;
einkasonur:einkason k47 ;
sonarsonur:sonarson k47 ;
fátæksmanssonur:fátæksmansson k47 ;
brøðrasynir:brøðrasyn k_flt47 ;
hamar:hamar k48 ;
øksarhamar:øksarhamar k48 ;
skúvhamar:skúvhamar k48 ;
liðaverkur:liðaverkj k49 ;
beinverkur:beinverkj k49 ;
bróstverkur:bróstverkj k49 ;
sjóverkur:sjóverkj k49 ;
barnverkir:barnverk k_flt49 ;
føðingarverkir:føðingarverk k_flt49 ;
barnsverkir:barnsverk k_flt49 ;
pínuverkir:pínuverk k_flt49 ;
uppíløga:uppíløg kv1e ;
stórmennisørska:stórmennisørsk kv1e ;
burka:burk kv1/2 ;
liga+CmpNP/First:lig kv1/2 ; ! Avoid -ligur
superliga:superlig kv1/2 ;
bundesliga:bundeslig kv1/2 ;
geologi:geo#logi kv2_1 ;
farra:farr kv1e ;
uppstøða:upp#støð kv1e ;
pjankus:pjankus k52e ;
allahalgan:allahalgan kv_bd2e ;
alhalgan:alhalgan kv_bd2e ;
navnfrægd:navnfrægd kv2e ;
nationalromantikk:national#romantikk kv2_1e ;
eggjamjólk:eggja#mjólk kv2e ;
rótan:rótan kv2e ;
undirger:undir#ger kv2_1e ;
natúr:natúr kv2_1e ;
fastalávint:fastalávint kv2_1e ;
norðurgerð:norður#gerð kv2e ;
alfaðir:al k43e ;
vetrarmjøll:vetrarmjøll kv3e ;
málsvørn:málsvørn kv3e ;
umboðsjørð:umboðsjørð kv3e ;
arbeiðsond:arbeiðsond kv4e ;
borðskomm:borðskomm kv4e ;
sodavatn:soda#vatn kv2_1/h5e ;
miðaløld:miðaløld kv5e ;
steinøld:steinøld kv5e ;
miðøld:miðøld kv5e ;
reið:reið kv2e/17e ;
brimreið:brimreið kv2e/17e ;
tórshamar:tórshamar k48e ;
gudsonur:gudson k47 ;
status:status k52 ;
alifjørður:ali#fjørð k46 ;
kyrrufjørður:kyrru#fjørð k46 ;
kaffimuður:kaffi#mu k51 ;
hemar:hemar k48 ;
kaktus:kaktus k52 ;
hoyrivídd:hoyrivídd kv3/2;
mjórødd:mjórødd kv3/2;
heldýpisrødd:heldýpisrødd kv3/2;
falsettrødd:falsettrødd kv3/2;
fríbaðistrond:fríbaðistrond kv2 ;
